Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201444-2916
Associations; provisions applicable.

To the extent applicable and when not in conflict with the Nebraska
Hospital and Physicians Mutual Insurance Association Act, the provisions of
the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act and
Chapters 44 and 77 relating to corporations and insurance shall apply to associations
incorporated pursuant to the Nebraska Hospital and Physicians Mutual Insurance
Association Act.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 16;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 218;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 222;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 288.
January 1, 2017
Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.